Nebraska, session 109, LB622.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB622 LB622
2025 2025
Section 1. Section 58-701, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
58-701 Sections 58-701 to 58-711 and section 6 of this act shall be
known and may be cited as the Nebraska Affordable Housing Act.
Sec. 2. Section 58-705, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
58-705 The Department of Economic Development shall use the
Affordable Housing Trust Fund to finance loans, grants, subsidies, credit
enhancements, and other financial assistance for community affordable
housing projects, for the Statewide Housing Assistance Program, and for
expenses of the department as appropriated by the Legislature for
administering the fund.
Sec. 3. Section 58-706, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
58-706 The following activities are eligible for assistance from the
Affordable Housing Trust Fund:
(1) New construction, rehabilitation, or acquisition of housing to
assist low-income and very low-income families;
(2) Matching funds for new construction, rehabilitation, or
acquisition of housing units to assist low-income and very low-income
families;
(3) Technical assistance, design and finance services, and
consultation for eligible nonprofit community or neighborhood-based
organizations involved in the creation of affordable housing;
(4) Matching funds for operating costs for housing assistance groups
or organizations when such grant or loan will substantially increase the
recipient's ability to produce affordable housing;
(5) Mortgage insurance guarantees for eligible projects;
(6) Acquisition of housing units for the purpose of preservation of
housing to assist low-income or very low-income families;
(7) Projects making affordable housing more accessible to families
-2-

LB622 LB622
2025 2025
with elderly members or members who have disabilities;
(8) Projects providing housing in areas determined by the Department
of Economic Development to be of critical importance for the continued
economic development and economic well-being of the community and where,
as determined by the department, a shortage of affordable housing exists;
(9) Infrastructure projects necessary for the development of
affordable housing;
(10) Downpayment and closing cost assistance;
(11) Demolition of existing vacant, condemned, or obsolete housing
or industrial buildings or infrastructure;
(12) Housing education programs developed in conjunction with
affordable housing projects. The education programs must be directed
toward:
(a) Preparing potential home buyers to purchase affordable housing
and postpurchase education;
(b) Target audiences eligible to utilize the services of housing
assistance groups or organizations; and
(c) Developers interested in the rehabilitation, acquisition, or
construction of affordable housing;
(13) Support for efforts to improve programs benefiting homeless
youth;
(14) Vocational training in the housing and construction trades
industries by nonprofit groups; and
(15) Weatherization and solar or other energy improvements to make
utilities for housing more affordable; and .
(16) Downpayment assistance under the Statewide Housing Assistance
Program.
Sec. 4. Section 58-707, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
58-707 Organizations which may receive assistance under the Nebraska
Affordable Housing Act are governmental subdivisions, local housing
-3-

LB622 LB622
2025 2025
authorities, community action agencies, community-based or neighborhood-
based or reservation-based nonprofit organizations, and for-profit
entities working in conjunction with one of the other eligible
organizations. For-profit entities that are eligible under this section
shall be required to provide, or cause to be provided, matching funds for
the eligible activity in an amount determined by the Department of
Economic Development, which amount shall be at least equal to ten percent
of the amount of assistance provided by the Affordable Housing Trust
Fund. Political subdivisions, local housing authorities, community action
agencies, and community-based, neighborhood-based, and reservation-based
nonprofit organizations shall not be required to provide, or cause to be
provided, such matching funds. Individuals may only Nothing in the act
shall be construed to allow individuals to receive direct loans from the
Affordable Housing Trust Fund as provided pursuant to the Statewide
Housing Assistance Program.
Sec. 5. Section 58-708, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
58-708 (1) During each calendar year in which funds are available
from the Affordable Housing Trust Fund for use by the Department of
Economic Development, the department shall make its best efforts to
allocate not less than thirty percent of such funds to each congressional
district. The department shall announce a grant and loan application
period of at least ninety days duration for all projects and homebuyers.
In selecting projects and homebuyers to receive trust fund assistance,
the department shall develop a qualified allocation plan and give first
priority to financially viable projects that serve the lowest income
occupants for the longest period of time and to the lowest income
homebuyers. The qualified allocation plan shall:
(a) Set forth selection criteria to be used to determine housing
priorities of the housing trust fund which are appropriate to local
conditions, including the community's immediate need for affordable
-4-

LB622 LB622
2025 2025
housing, proposed increases in home ownership, private dollars leveraged,
level of local government support and participation, and repayment, in
part or in whole, of financial assistance awarded by the fund; and
(b) Give first priority in allocating trust fund assistance among
selected projects to those projects which are located in whole or in part
within an enterprise zone designated pursuant to the Enterprise Zone Act
or an opportunity zone designated pursuant to the federal Tax Cuts and
Jobs Act, Public Law 115-97, serve the lowest income occupant, are
located in an area that has been declared an extremely blighted area
under section 18-2101.02, and are obligated to serve qualified occupants
for the longest period of time; and .
(c) Give first priority in allocating trust fund assistance among
selected homebuyers to those homebuyers which are located within an
enterprise zone designated pursuant to the Enterprise Zone Act or an
opportunity zone designated pursuant to the federal Tax Cuts and Jobs
Act, Public Law 115-97, are for the lowest income homebuyers, and are
located in an area that has been declared an extremely blighted area
under section 18-2101.02.
(2) The department shall fund in order of priority as many
applications as will utilize available funds less actual administrative
costs of the department in administering the program. In administering
the program the department may contract for services or directly provide
funds to other governmental entities or instrumentalities.
(3) The department may recapture any funds which were allocated to a
qualified recipient for an eligible project through an award agreement if
such funds were not utilized for eligible costs within the time of
performance under the agreement and are therefor no longer obligated to
the project. The recaptured funds shall be credited to the Affordable
Housing Trust Fund.
Sec. 6. (1) The Statewide Housing Assistance Program is created and
shall be administered by a nonprofit organization contracted by the
-5-

LB622 LB622
2025 2025
Department of Economic Development.
(2) The program shall provide downpayment assistance for homebuyers
across the state.
(3) Any homebuyer specified in rules and regulations adopted and
promulgated by the department may apply for assistance under the program.
(4) An assistance recipient under the program shall only use the
assistance for a downpayment on a home that shall be occupied by such
assistance recipient as their primary residence.
(5) Downpayment assistance under the program shall be in the form of
a loan that shall be repaid upon transfer of title of the home such
assistance is used for and such home shall be subject to a lien for the
amount of assistance provided for such home.
(6) Downpayment assistance shall be limited to thirty thousand
dollars per homebuyer.
Sec. 7. Section 58-711, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
58-711 (1) The Department of Economic Development shall submit, as
part of the department's annual status report under section 81-1201.11,
the following information regarding the Affordable Housing Trust Fund:
(a) The applications funded during the previous calendar year; (b) the
applications funded in previous years; (c) the identity of the
organizations or homebuyers receiving funds; (d) the location of each
project or homebuyer; (e) the amount of funding provided to each project
or homebuyer; (f) the amount of funding leveraged as a result of each
project; (g) the number of units of housing created by each project and
the occupancy rate; (h) the expected cost of rent or monthly payment of
those units; (i) the projected number of new employees and community
investment as a result of each project; (j) the amount of revenue
deposited into the Affordable Housing Trust Fund pursuant to section
76-903; (k) the total amount of funds for which applications were
received during the previous calendar year, the year-end fund balance,
-6-

LB622 LB622
2025 2025
and, if all available funds have not been committed, an explanation of
the reasons why all such funds have not been so committed; (l) the amount
of appropriated funds actually expended by the department for the
previous calendar year; (m) the department's current budget for
administration of the Nebraska Affordable Housing Act and the
department's planned use and distribution of funds, including details on
the amount of funds to be expended on projects and the amount of funds to
be expended by the department for administrative purposes; and (n)
project summaries, including the applicant municipality, project
description, grant amount requested, amount and type of matching funds,
and reasons for approval or denial for every application seeking funds
during the previous calendar year.
(2) The status report shall contain no information that is protected
by state or federal confidentiality laws.
Sec. 8. Section 76-901, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
76-901 There is hereby imposed a tax on the grantor executing the
deed as defined in section 76-203 upon the transfer of a beneficial
interest in or legal title to real estate at the rate of two dollars and
fifty-five twenty-five cents for each one thousand dollars value or
fraction thereof. For purposes of sections 76-901 to 76-908, value means
(1) in the case of any deed, not a gift, the amount of the full actual
consideration thereof, paid or to be paid, including the amount of any
lien or liens assumed, and (2) in the case of a gift or any deed with
nominal consideration or without stated consideration, the current market
value of the property transferred. Such tax shall be evidenced by stamps
to be attached to the deed. All deeds purporting to transfer legal title
or beneficial interest shall be presumed taxable unless it clearly
appears on the face of the deed or sufficient documentary proof is
presented to the register of deeds that the instrument is exempt under
section 76-902.
-7-

LB622 LB622
2025 2025
Sec. 9. Section 76-903, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
76-903 The Tax Commissioner shall design such stamps in such
denominations as in his or her judgment will be the most advantageous to
all persons concerned. When any deed subject to the tax imposed by
section 76-901 is offered for recordation, the register of deeds shall
ascertain and compute the amount of the tax due thereon and shall collect
such amount as a prerequisite to acceptance of the deed for recordation.
If a dispute arises concerning the taxability of the transfer, the
register of deeds shall not record the deed until the disputed tax is
paid. If a disputed tax has been paid, the taxpayer may file for a refund
pursuant to section 76-908. The taxpayer may also seek a declaratory
ruling pursuant to rules and regulations adopted and promulgated by the
Department of Revenue. From each two dollars and fifty-five twenty-five
cents of tax collected pursuant to section 76-901, the register of deeds
shall retain fifty cents to be placed in the county general fund and
shall remit the balance to the State Treasurer who shall credit one
dollar and twenty-five ninety-five cents of such amount to the Affordable
Housing Trust Fund, twenty-five cents of such amount to the Site and
Building Development Fund, twenty-five cents of such amount to the
Homeless Shelter Assistance Trust Fund, and thirty cents of such amount
to the Behavioral Health Services Fund.
Sec. 10. Section 77-1327, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
77-1327 (1) It is the intent of the Legislature that accurate and
comprehensive information be developed by the Property Tax Administrator
and made accessible to the taxing officials and property owners in order
to ensure the uniformity and proportionality of the assessments of real
property valuations in the state in accordance with law and to provide
the statistical and narrative reports pursuant to section 77-5027.
(2) All transactions of real property for which the statement
-8-

LB622 LB622
2025 2025
required in section 76-214 is filed shall be available for development of
a sales file by the Property Tax Administrator. All transactions with
stated consideration of more than one hundred dollars or upon which more
than two dollars and fifty-five twenty-five cents in documentary stamp
taxes are paid shall be considered sales. All sales shall be deemed to be
arm's length transactions unless determined to be otherwise under
professionally accepted mass appraisal techniques. The Department of
Revenue shall not overturn a determination made by a county assessor
regarding the qualification of a sale unless the department reviews the
sale and determines through the review that the determination made by the
county assessor is incorrect.
(3) The Property Tax Administrator annually shall make and issue
comprehensive assessment ratio studies of the average level of
assessment, the degree of assessment uniformity, and the overall
compliance with assessment requirements for each major class of real
property subject to the property tax in each county. The comprehensive
assessment ratio studies shall be developed in compliance with
professionally accepted mass appraisal techniques and shall employ such
statistical analysis as deemed appropriate by the Property Tax
Administrator, including measures of central tendency and dispersion. The
comprehensive assessment ratio studies shall be based upon the sales file
as developed in subsection (2) of this section and shall be used by the
Property Tax Administrator for the analysis of the level of value and
quality of assessment for purposes of section 77-5027 and by the Property
Tax Administrator in establishing the adjusted valuations required by
section 79-1016. Such studies may also be used by assessing officials in
establishing assessed valuations.
(4) For purposes of determining the level of value of agricultural
and horticultural land subject to special valuation under sections
77-1343 to 77-1347.01, the Property Tax Administrator shall annually make
and issue a comprehensive study developed in compliance with
-9-

LB622 LB622
2025 2025
professionally accepted mass appraisal techniques to establish the level
of value if in his or her opinion the level of value cannot be developed
through the use of the comprehensive assessment ratio studies developed
in subsection (3) of this section.
(5) County assessors and other taxing officials shall electronically
report data on the assessed valuation and other features of the property
assessment process for such periods and in such form and content as the
Property Tax Administrator shall deem appropriate. The Property Tax
Administrator shall so construct and maintain the system used to collect
and analyze the data to enable him or her to make intracounty comparisons
of assessed valuation, including school districts and other political
subdivisions, as well as intercounty comparisons of assessed valuation,
including school districts and other political subdivisions. The Property
Tax Administrator shall include analysis of real property sales pursuant
to land contracts and similar transfers at the time of execution of the
contract or similar transfer.
Sec. 11. This act becomes operative on October 1, 2025.
Sec. 12. Original sections 58-701, 58-705, 58-706, 58-707, 58-708,
58-711, 76-901, 76-903, and 77-1327, Reissue Revised Statutes of
Nebraska, are repealed.
-10-